South Dakota, session 2026, HB1094.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 34-26:
An individual's consent to be an organ donor does not constitute consent for the
donation or retrieval of the individual's ovum or sperm, unless the individual explicitly
consents to the donation or retrieval of ovum or sperm.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.